Alabama, session 2026rs, HB519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. As used in this act, the following words
have the following meanings:
(1) COUNCIL. The Town Council of the Town of White Hall
in Lowndes County.
(2) LICENSEE. A person licensed by the council to
conduct charitable bingo pursuant to Sections 43A-2.00 or
43A-2.01 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, in a facility
not less than 40,000 square feet and in existence on October
1, 2023, with the mailing address of 6999 Highway 80 West,
Hayneville, Alabama 36040.
(3) SIMULCAST. Televised or broadcast by other
electronic means.
Section 2. The council may authorize a licensee to
conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast past events and live
Page 1

conduct pari-mutuel wagering on simulcast past events and live
HB519 INTRODUCED
horse and dog races.
Section 3. (a)(1) The council is vested with the powers
and duties specified in this act and all other powers
necessary and proper to enable the council to execute fully
and effectually the purposes of this act.
(2) The council shall adopt rules specifying the
conditions under which the licensee, as part of its licensed
activity, may cause simulcast programming of pari-mutuel
events, including both past events and live horse and dog
races, held at racetracks located outside the state to be
transmitted for public viewing to the licensee and made the
subject of pari-mutuel wagering.
(3) Subject to the exceptions as the council may
approve by rule in order to satisfy applicable requirements of
federal law, all pari-mutuel wagering with respect to racing
events that are the subject of simulcast programming shall be
subject to the rules of the council governing pari-mutuel
wagering.
(b) The council shall receive no revenue from the
simulcast programming of racing events other than the
following:
(1) The commission horse wagering fee due with respect
to that part of the horse racing handle wagered on simulcast
horse racing events by bettors placing bets at the facility in
the jurisdiction of the council.
(2) The commission dog wagering fee due with respect to
that part of the dog wagering handle wagered on simulcast dog
racing events by bettors placing bets at the facility in the
Page 2

racing events by bettors placing bets at the facility in the
HB519 INTRODUCED
jurisdiction of the council.
(3) A portion of tax revenues with respect to the
taxation provided and allocated for in this act.
(c)(1) If permitted by federal law and made possible by
contractual arrangements with the operator of the racetrack
that originates the simulcast programming, the licensee may
conduct pari-mutuel wagering on past events and live horse or
dog racing events simulcast to the facility in the municipal
jurisdiction of the council from locations outside the state.
(2) When conducting pari-mutuel wagering under
subdivision (1), the pari-mutuel pools for the wagering may be
limited to bets made by bettors placing bets at the facility
located in the jurisdiction of the council or, alternatively,
the pari-mutuel pools may include bets made by bettors placing
bets at the facility that conducts the simulcast event, as
well as bets made by bettors placing bets at one or more
locations outside the state; provided, that to the extent
bettors placing bets at the facility located in the
jurisdiction of the council participate in the pari-mutuel
pools, the total amount wagered by the bettors shall be
administered in accordance with the rules of the council.
Section 4. (a) The council shall adopt rules specifying
the conditions under which the licensee, as part of its
licensed activity, may cause simulcast programming of
pari-mutuel events, including both past events and live horse
and dog races, held at racetracks located outside the state to
be transmitted for public viewing to the licensee and there
made the subject of pari-mutuel wagering.
Page 3

made the subject of pari-mutuel wagering.
HB519 INTRODUCED
(b) Subject to the exceptions as the council may
approve by rule in order to satisfy applicable requirements of
federal law, all pari-mutuel wagering with respect to racing
events that are the subject of simulcast programming shall be
subject to the rules of the council governing pari-mutuel
wagering.
Section 5. (a) A licensee conducting pari-mutuel
wagering shall pay to the council, for the use of the council,
a tax in an amount equal to four percent of the total
contributions less prizes paid to winners. The tax may be
adjusted as determined necessary by the council but shall not
exceed four percent.
(b) From the taxes paid to the council, the tax revenue
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty percent to the Lowndes County Commission.
100 (2) Twenty percent to the Lowndes County Board of
101 Education.
102 (3) Sixty percent to the council, of which amount 10
103 percent shall be distributed to other municipalities in
104 Lowndes County. In addition, the council may distribute any
105 amount of monies received pursuant to this subdivision to any
106 charity in Lowndes County that is approved by the council.
107 (c) A licensee conducting historical pari-mutuel
108 wagering shall pay to the State of Alabama a tax in an amount
109 equal to one percent of the total contributions less prizes
110 paid to winners.
111 Section 6. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
112 authorize or make lawful "off-track betting" or wagering or
Page 4

authorize or make lawful "off-track betting" or wagering or
HB519 INTRODUCED
113 gambling of any kind at any location in the state other than
114 at the facility of a person who is a licensee of the council.
115 All laws of the state, whether local or general, and all
116 ordinances of any political subdivision thereof, that
117 prohibit, restrict, or regulate wagering or gambling of any
118 kind outside the jurisdiction of the council, shall not be
119 affected by this act and shall remain in full force and
120 effect.
121 Section 7. This act shall become effective on October
122 1, 2026.
Page 5